District of Columbia statutes.
1-1206

Exemption from execution.

A notary’s official seal and his official documents shall be exempt from execution.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1279, ch. 854, § 564
This section is referenced in § 1-1217.
1981 Ed., § 1-806.
1973 Ed., § 1-507.